Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2234.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XX-ASPENT GRAIN DONATION TAX CREDITSection 2001-A. Scope of article.This article relates to a tax credit for the donation of <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021 spent grain byproduct by qualified taxpayers to eligible agricultural operations.Section 2002-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Eligible agricultural operation." An agricultural operation located no more than 100 miles from an eligible facility that engages in normal agricultural operation."Eligible facility." A facility within this Commonwealth at which malt or brewed beverages are brewed or manufactured by a qualified taxpayer and that produces spent grain byproduct as a result of the brewing or manufacturing process."Malt or brewed beverages." Alcoholic beverages, including beer, lager beer, ale, porter or similar fermented malt liquor, containing 0.5% or more of alcohol, by whatever name the liquors may be called."Normal agricultural operation." As defined in section 2 of the act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), referred to as the Right-to-Farm Law."Qualified tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed under Article XX."Qualified taxpayer." A person engaged in the brewing or manufacturing of malt or brewed beverages for sale and subject to tax under Article XX."Spent grain byproduct." Material remaining from grain used to produce malt or brewed beverages."Tax credit." The spent grain donation tax credit provided for under this article.20260HB2234PN3583 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2003-A. Application and approval of tax credit.(a) Application.-- (1) A qualified taxpayer may apply to the department for a tax credit against the tax imposed under Article XX. The application shall be on a form created by the department.(2) The application must be submitted to the department by February 1 of each year for the tax credit claimed for spent grain byproduct donated to an eligible agricultural operation during the prior calendar year.(b) Amount.--A qualified taxpayer shall receive a tax credit equal to 16¢ multiplied by the number of pounds dry weight of spent grain byproduct donated by the taxpayer during the taxable year to an eligible agricultural operation for agricultural use, not to exceed the lesser of:(1) $30,000; or(2) the total amount of the qualified taxpayer's qualified tax liability for the taxable year in which the donation was made.(c) Review and approval.-- (1) The department shall review and approve applications meeting the requirements of this article by March 20 of each year.(2) The department may require information necessary to document that a facility qualifies as an eligible facility and the amount of spent grain byproduct donated to an eligible agricultural operation.(3) In the review of applications for tax credits, the department shall consult with the Liquor Control Board with respect to whether a facility qualifies as an eligible facility and to review the eligible facility's calculation of 20260HB2234PN3583 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the amount of spent grain byproduct donated.(4) Prior to approving an application, the applicant must have:(i) Filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years.(ii) Paid any balance of State tax due as determined by assessment or determination by the department and not under timely appeal.(5) Upon approval, the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate stating the amount of tax credit granted for donation of spent grain byproduct in the prior calendar year.Section 2004-A. Claim of tax credit.(a) Claim.--A qualified taxpayer may claim a tax credit against the qualified tax liability of the qualified taxpayer.(b) Use of credit.--A tax credit may be claimed against a qualified tax liability for a taxable year that begins in the same calendar year that the spent grain byproduct was donated to an eligible agricultural operation.Section 2005-A. Carryover and carryback.(a) Carryover.-- (1) If a qualified taxpayer does not use all or any portion of a tax credit for the taxable year in which the tax credit is first approved, the excess may be carried over to succeeding taxable years and used as a credit against the qualified tax liability of the qualified taxpayer for those taxable years.(2) Each time the tax credit is carried over to a succeeding taxable year, the tax credit shall be reduced by the amount that was used as a credit during the immediately 20260HB2234PN3583 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 preceding taxable year.(3) The tax credit may be carried over and applied to succeeding taxable years for no more than seven taxable years following the first taxable year for which the taxpayer was entitled to claim the tax credit.(b) No carryback or refund.--A qualified taxpayer is not entitled to carry back or obtain a refund of all or any portion of an unused tax credit granted to the qualified taxpayer under this article.Section 2006-A. Administration.(a) Audits and assessments.--The department shall have the following powers:(1) To audit a qualified taxpayer claiming a tax credit to ascertain the validity of the amount claimed.(2) To issue an assessment against a qualified taxpayer for an improperly issued tax credit. The procedures, collection, enforcement and appeals of any assessment made under this section shall be governed by Article IV.(b) Guidelines.--The department shall develop written guidelines for the implementation of this article.Section 2007-A. Annual report to General Assembly.By October 1, 2027, and October 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report on the tax credit to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include:20260HB2234PN3583 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The names of the qualified taxpayers utilizing the tax credit as of the date of the report and the amount of tax credits approved for, utilized by or sold or assigned by a qualified taxpayer.(2) Data concerning the benefits provided to the Commonwealth in terms of the quantity of spent grain byproduct donated to eligible agricultural operations.Section 2008-A. Applicability.The tax credit shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.SECTION 1. SECTION 2010(B) AND (E) OF THE ACT OF MARCH 4, 1971 (P.L.6, NO.2), KNOWN AS THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971, ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:SECTION 2010. LIMITED TAX CREDITS.--* * *(B) AS USED IN THIS SECTION:"AMOUNTS PAID." THE PHRASE MEANS (I) AMOUNTS ACTUALLY PAID, OR (II) AT THE TAXPAYER'S ELECTION, AMOUNTS PROMISED TO BE PAID UNDER FIRM PURCHASE CONTRACTS ACTUALLY EXECUTED DURING ANY CALENDAR YEAR FALLING WITHIN THE EFFECTIVE PERIOD OF THIS SECTION: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, THAT THERE SHALL BE NO DUPLICATION OF "AMOUNTS PAID" UNDER THIS DEFINITION."EFFECTIVE PERIOD." THE PERIOD FROM JANUARY 1, 1974, TO DECEMBER 31, 2008, AND THE PERIOD AFTER JUNE 30, 2017, INCLUSIVE."PURCHASER." A PERSON WHO PURCHASES A TAX CREDIT FROM A TAXPAYER."QUALIFYING CAPITAL EXPENDITURES." AMOUNTS PAID BY A TAXPAYER DURING THE EFFECTIVE PERIOD OF THIS SECTION FOR THE PURCHASE OF ITEMS OF PLANT, MACHINERY OR EQUIPMENT FOR USE BY 20260HB2234PN3583 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE TAXPAYER WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH IN THE MANUFACTURE AND SALE OF MALT OR BREWED BEVERAGES: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, THAT THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF QUALIFYING CAPITAL EXPENDITURES MADE BY A TAXPAYER WITHIN A SINGLE CALENDAR YEAR SHALL NOT EXCEED TWO HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS ($200,000)."SECRETARY." THE SECRETARY OF REVENUE OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA WHERE NOT OTHERWISE QUALIFIED."TAXPAYER." A MANUFACTURER OF MALT OR BREWED BEVERAGES CLAIMING A TAX CREDIT OR CREDITS UNDER THIS SECTION.* * *(E) UPON RECEIPT FROM A TAXPAYER OF A CERTIFICATE FROM THE SECRETARY ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (C), THE SECRETARY OF REVENUE SHALL GRANT A TAX CREDIT OR CREDITS IN THE AMOUNT CERTIFIED AGAINST ANY TAX DUE UNDER THIS ARTICLE IN THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH THE EXPENDITURES WERE INCURRED OR AGAINST ANY TAX BECOMING DUE FROM THE TAXPAYER UNDER THIS ARTICLE IN THE FOLLOWING [THREE] FIVE CALENDAR YEARS. NO CREDIT SHALL BE ALLOWED AGAINST ANY TAX DUE FOR ANY TAXABLE PERIOD ENDING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2008, AND BEGINNING BEFORE JULY 1, 2017.* * *(H) (1) A TAXPAYER, UPON APPLICATION TO AND APPROVAL BY THE DEPARTMENT, MAY SELL OR ASSIGN, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, A TAX CREDIT GRANTED UNDER THIS SECTION. A TAX CREDIT MAY ONLY BE SOLD OR ASSIGNED TO A TAXPAYER UNDER THIS ARTICLE.(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE GUIDELINES FOR THE APPROVAL OF APPLICATIONS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.(3) BEFORE APPROVAL, THE DEPARTMENT MUST VERIFY THAT THE TAXPAYER HAS FILED ALL REQUIRED STATE TAX REPORTS AND RETURNS FOR ALL APPLICABLE TAX YEARS AND PAID ANY OUTSTANDING BALANCES AS DETERMINED THROUGH SETTLEMENT, ASSESSMENT OR DETERMINATION.20260HB2234PN3583 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SETTLE, ASSESS OR DETERMINE THE TAXPAYER'S TAX LIABILITY WITHIN NINETY DAYS OF RECEIVING ALL REQUIRED FINAL RETURNS OR REPORTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 806.1(A)(5) OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.343, NO.176), KNOWN AS "THE FISCAL CODE."(I) (1) THE PURCHASER OF ALL OR PART OF A TAX CREDIT SHALL IMMEDIATELY CLAIM THE CREDIT IN THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE PURCHASE OR ASSIGNMENT OCCURS.(2) THE TAX CREDIT MAY ONLY BE APPLIED TO THE PURCHASER'S TAX LIABILITY UNDER THIS ARTICLE AND MAY NOT EXCEED FIFTY PER CENT OF THE PURCHASER'S TAX LIABILITY FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR.(3) A PURCHASER WHO IS ALSO A TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM THE PURCHASED TAX CREDIT IN ADDITION TO THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF QUALIFYING CAPITAL EXPENDITURE THE PURCHASER CLAIMS SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.(4) THE PURCHASER MAY NOT CARRY FORWARD, CARRY BACK OR OBTAIN A REFUND OF THE TAX CREDIT.(5) THE PURCHASER MAY NOT SELL OR ASSIGN A PURCHASED TAX CREDIT.(6) THE PURCHASER SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF THE SELLER OR ASSIGNOR OF THE TAX CREDIT IN A MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT.SECTION 2. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 2010.1. SPENT GRAIN DONATION TAX CREDIT.--(A) (1) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR A TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER THIS ARTICLE. THE APPLICATION SHALL BE ON A FORM CREATED BY THE DEPARTMENT.(2) THE APPLICATION MUST BE SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT BY APRIL 1 OF EACH YEAR FOR THE TAX CREDIT CLAIMED FOR SPENT GRAIN BYPRODUCT DONATED TO AN ELIGIBLE AGRICULTURAL OPERATION DURING 20260HB2234PN3583 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE PRIOR CALENDAR YEAR.(3) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER SHALL RECEIVE A TAX CREDIT EQUAL TO SIXTEEN CENTS (16¢) MULTIPLIED BY THE NUMBER OF POUNDS DRY WEIGHT OF SPENT GRAIN BYPRODUCT DONATED BY THE TAXPAYER DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR TO AN ELIGIBLE AGRICULTURAL OPERATION FOR AGRICULTURAL USE, NOT TO EXCEED THE LESSER OF:(I) THIRTY THOUSAND DOLLARS ($30,000); OR (II) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S QUALIFIED TAX LIABILITY FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE DONATION WAS MADE.(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW AND APPROVE APPLICATIONS MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION BY JULY 1 OF EACH YEAR.(5) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE INFORMATION NECESSARY TO DOCUMENT THAT A FACILITY QUALIFIES AS AN ELIGIBLE FACILITY AND THE AMOUNT OF SPENT GRAIN BYPRODUCT DONATED TO AN ELIGIBLE AGRICULTURAL OPERATION.(6) PRIOR TO APPROVING AN APPLICATION, THE APPLICANT MUST HAVE:(I) FILED ALL REQUIRED STATE TAX REPORTS AND RETURNS FOR ALL APPLICABLE TAXABLE YEARS.(II) PAID ANY BALANCE OF STATE TAX DUE AS DETERMINED BY ASSESSMENT OR DETERMINATION BY THE DEPARTMENT AND NOT UNDER TIMELY APPEAL.(7) UPON APPROVAL, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO THE APPLICANT A CERTIFICATE STATING THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT GRANTED FOR DONATION OF SPENT GRAIN BYPRODUCT IN THE PRIOR CALENDAR YEAR.(8) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS GRANTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL NOT EXCEED FIVE MILLION DOLLARS ($5,000,000) IN ANY FISCAL YEAR.20260HB2234PN3583 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) (1) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM A TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE QUALIFIED TAX LIABILITY OF THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER.(2) A TAX CREDIT MAY BE CLAIMED AGAINST A QUALIFIED TAX LIABILITY FOR A TAXABLE YEAR THAT BEGINS IN THE SAME CALENDAR YEAR THAT THE SPENT GRAIN BYPRODUCT WAS DONATED TO AN ELIGIBLE AGRICULTURAL OPERATION.(C) (1) IF A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER DOES NOT USE ALL OR ANY PORTION OF A TAX CREDIT FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE TAX CREDIT IS FIRST APPROVED, THE EXCESS MAY BE CARRIED OVER TO SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS AND USED AS A CREDIT AGAINST THE QUALIFIED TAX LIABILITY OF THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER FOR THOSE TAXABLE YEARS.(2) EACH TIME THE TAX CREDIT IS CARRIED OVER TO A SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEAR, THE TAX CREDIT SHALL BE REDUCED BY THE AMOUNT THAT WAS USED AS A CREDIT DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING TAXABLE YEAR.(3) THE TAX CREDIT MAY BE CARRIED OVER AND APPLIED TO SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS FOR NO MORE THAN FIVE TAXABLE YEARS FOLLOWING THE FIRST TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE TAXPAYER WAS ENTITLED TO CLAIM THE TAX CREDIT.(4) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER IS NOT ENTITLED TO CARRY BACK OR OBTAIN A REFUND OF ALL OR ANY PORTION OF AN UNUSED TAX CREDIT GRANTED TO THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER UNDER THIS SECTION.(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING POWERS:(I) TO AUDIT A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER CLAIMING A TAX CREDIT TO ASCERTAIN THE VALIDITY OF THE AMOUNT CLAIMED.(II) TO ISSUE AN ASSESSMENT AGAINST A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER FOR AN IMPROPERLY ISSUED TAX CREDIT. THE PROCEDURES, COLLECTION, ENFORCEMENT AND APPEALS OF ANY ASSESSMENT MADE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE GOVERNED BY ARTICLE IV.20260HB2234PN3583 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP WRITTEN GUIDELINES FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION.(E) BY OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND OCTOBER 1 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT ON THE TAX CREDIT TO THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE, THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE FINANCE COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE FINANCE COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES. THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:(1) THE NAMES OF THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYERS UTILIZING THE TAX CREDIT AS OF THE DATE OF THE REPORT AND THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS APPROVED FOR, UTILIZED BY OR ASSIGNED BY A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER.(2) DATA CONCERNING THE BENEFITS PROVIDED TO THE COMMONWEALTH IN TERMS OF THE QUANTITY OF SPENT GRAIN BYPRODUCT DONATED TO ELIGIBLE AGRICULTURAL OPERATIONS.(F) THE TAX CREDIT SHALL APPLY TO TAXABLE YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2025.(G) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"ELIGIBLE AGRICULTURAL OPERATION." AN AGRICULTURAL OPERATION LOCATED NO MORE THAN ONE HUNDRED MILES FROM AN ELIGIBLE FACILITY THAT ENGAGES IN NORMAL AGRICULTURAL OPERATION."ELIGIBLE FACILITY." A FACILITY WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH AT WHICH MALT OR BREWED BEVERAGES ARE BREWED OR MANUFACTURED BY A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER AND THAT PRODUCES SPENT GRAIN BYPRODUCT AS A RESULT OF THE BREWING OR MANUFACTURING PROCESS.20260HB2234PN3583 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "NORMAL AGRICULTURAL OPERATION." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF JUNE 10, 1982 (P.L.454, NO.133), REFERRED TO AS THE RIGHT-TO-FARM LAW."QUALIFIED TAX LIABILITY." THE LIABILITY FOR TAXES IMPOSED UNDER THIS ARTICLE."QUALIFIED TAXPAYER." A MANUFACTURER OF MALT OR BREWED BEVERAGES SUBJECT TO TAX UNDER THIS ARTICLE AND CLAIMING A TAX CREDIT OR CREDITS UNDER THIS SECTION."SPENT GRAIN BYPRODUCT." MATERIAL REMAINING FROM GRAIN USED TO PRODUCE MALT OR BREWED BEVERAGES."TAX CREDIT." THE SPENT GRAIN DONATION TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION.Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2234PN3583 - 12 - <--12345678910111213